District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Strengthening Capacity and Transparency at DYRS Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 104b of the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment
Act of 2004, effective April 4, 2017 (D.C. Law 21-238; D.C. Official Code § 2-1515.04b), is
amended by adding new subsections (c) and (d) to read as follows:
“(c) Notwithstanding section 106, the Department shall publicly report on their website
population data for youth at the Youth Services Center (“YSC”) and New Beginnings Youth
Development Center, which shall include:
“(1) Daily population counts by status at entry, race, and age;
“(2) Average length of stay for all youth within the facility;
“(3) The monthly number of youth who:
“(A) Are newly admitted to the YSC already with committed status; or
“(B) Convert to committed status from another legal status while at YSC;
“(4) The monthly number of youth who are placed in instances of improper room
confinement pursuant to section 203 of the Improving the Conditions of Confinement of
Juveniles Act of 2016, effective April 4, 2017 (D.C. Law 21-238; D.C. Official Code § 24-912),
including instances in which they are confined to their room for a period exceeding 6 hours;
“(5) The average number of days confined for committed youth at release from
the YSC, by month of admission or conversion to committed status;
“(6) Monthly critical incident and assault data by incident type, facility, and
month; and
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(7) Recidivism data, which shall be measured using the following metrics and
publicly reported at 12-month, 24-month, and 36-month intervals:
“(A) The percentage of youth who are adjudicated delinquent or convicted
of a new offense within 12 months of release from an out-of-home committed placement;
“(B) The percentage of youth who are charged with a new offense within
12 months of release from an out-of-home committed placement; and
“(C) The percentage of youth who are committed or incarcerated as a
result of a new offense within 12 months of release from an out-of-home committed placement.
“(d) Within 120 days after the applicability date of the Strengthening Capacity and
Transparency at DYRS Amendment Act of 2026, passed on 2nd reading on March 31, 2026
(Enrolled version of Bill 26-407), the Mayor shall submit to the Council a one-year action plan
to address overcrowding and the awaiting placement population at the Youth Services Center.
The plan shall specify how the Department will permanently reduce the juvenile population at
the Youth Services Center to at or below its maximum capacity and avoid future instances of
overcrowding.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5 Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3